Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 7
COLORADO NURSING SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM

23-3.3-701. Colorado nursing scholarship program.

The general assembly hereby authorizes the commission to establish a nursing scholarship program. Such program shall be administered in accordance with policies and procedures established by the commission. The general assembly may appropriate annually an amount for the support of such program.

The commission shall determine, by guideline, the institutions of higher education eligible for participation in the scholarship program.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, under the policies and procedures established by the commission under subsection (1) of this section for awarding nursing scholarships, preference be given to individuals who shall work in federal qualifying health clinics and underserved areas with nursing shortages throughout the state.

and (5) Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 588, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(5) amended, p. 123, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 1238, § 85, effective August 7.

L. 99:

(4) repealed, p. 850, § 5, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

(5) repealed, p. 1113, § 1, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.